Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Tennessee Agricultural Development Act

4-31-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Agricultural Development Act.”

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 1.

Cross-References. Chapter definitions, §4-31-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

4-31-202. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The high cost and limited availability of agricultural financing threatens to halt needed expansion or even perpetuation of many farm operations and related enterprises in Tennessee;

These conditions severely limit the ability of young persons to begin farming or to carry on family farming traditions;

Resulting shortages in agricultural commodities will aggravate food price inflation; and

Resulting reductions in agricultural employment will contribute to overall unemployment with its attendant problems.

It is accordingly in furtherance of the interests and welfare of all Tennesseans that the Tennessee local development authority be empowered to issue revenue bonds, and to make the proceeds available for loans to farmers and farm-related enterprises that private industry alone would be otherwise unable to serve, at interest rates lower than would otherwise be obtainable.

It is intended that the Tennessee local development authority be vested with all powers necessary to the accomplishment of these purposes.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

4-31-203. Loans — General power of authority.

The authority may make, and undertake commitments to make, loans to or deposits with lenders under the agricultural development loan program for the financing of certain agricultural enterprises under terms and conditions that shall:

Require the proceeds thereof to be used by such lenders to make loans for agricultural enterprises; and

Require that no loans made by such lenders to finance a single agricultural enterprise shall exceed the aggregate principal amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

The authority may invest in, purchase or make commitments to invest in or purchase, and take assignments of, loans made by lenders for the construction, rehabilitation or purchase of agricultural enterprises. No loan shall be eligible for investment in, purchase or assignment by the authority:

If the loan was initially made more than six (6) months prior to the date of investment, purchase or assignment; or

If the aggregate principal amount of the loan received by a person exceeds five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), and in computing that amount a loan received by an individual shall be aggregated with those loans received by such individual's spouse and children, and a loan received by a firm, partnership or corporation shall be aggregated with those loans received by each owner, partner or stockholder thereof.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 6; 1983, ch. 115, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

4-31-204. Loans — Prerequisites to action under § 4-31-203.

Prior to an exercise of powers conferred by § 4-31-203(b), the authority shall:

Require the lender to certify that the loan at the time of making was, is or will be in all respects a prudent investment;

Require the lender to certify that it would not have made the loan if the authority had not agreed to purchase the loan pursuant to § 4-31-203(b);

Require the lender to certify, if the principal amount of the loan is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more, that the borrower has obtained at least one (1) written declination of credit from a lender in or near the borrower's local community; and

Require that the loan involved be insured by a loan insurer or be guaranteed by a loan guarantor or that the payment of principal and interest on the notes or bonds be insured or guaranteed.

Prior to the exercise of powers conferred by § 4-31-203, the authority shall for all loans to be made pursuant to the agricultural loan development program for agricultural enterprises:

Require any type of security that it deems reasonable and necessary;

Authorize the reservation of funds by lenders in such amounts and subject to such conditions as the authority considers reasonable and necessary; and

Require that all agriculture enterprises for which funds are advanced, loaned or otherwise provided by the authority under this chapter be in compliance with any state or local land use, zoning, subdivision and other laws applicable to the land upon which such enterprise is located or is to be constructed.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

4-31-205. Bonds and notes.

For the purpose of providing moneys to assist lenders in providing moneys to finance agricultural enterprises, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority.

The proceeds of such bonds and notes may be applied by the authority to the making of loans to or deposits with lenders or the purchase of loans made by lenders as set forth in § 4-31-203.

Bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section shall not be issued and sold as part of an issue of bonds or notes of the authority issued pursuant to any other provision of this chapter or other law.

The authority has the power, and is hereby authorized, to issue from time to time renewal notes, and bonds to pay notes issued in anticipation of such bonds, and, whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of refunding bonds whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other authorized purpose.

Such refunding bonds and renewal notes may be issued without further authorization, such issuance being deemed authorized by the law authorizing the bonds and notes to be renewed, paid or refunded.

The refunding bonds shall be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded.

Each issue of its notes or bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be limited special obligations of the authority payable solely from and secured by amounts derived by the authority from loans purchased with the proceeds of such bonds or notes, payments made by lenders pursuant to loan agreements with such lenders, or proceeds derived from the certificates of deposit or other obligations of lenders purchased from bond proceeds.

The bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant, contribution or guarantee from the federal government or any corporation, association, institution or person or a pledge of any money, income or revenue of the authority from any source.

The authority shall not issue bonds and notes under this part in an aggregate principal amount at any one (1) time outstanding exceeding thirty million dollars ($30,000,000), excluding bonds or notes for the payment or redemption of which there has been or will be set aside and held in trust either moneys or direct and general obligations of, or obligations guaranteed by, the United States, or obligations secured by such obligations, or any combination thereof, that are or will be sufficient to pay when due the principal or applicable redemption price and all accrued interest thereon and, if such bonds or notes are to be redeemed, for which notice of redemption has been given or satisfactory provision has been made for the giving of such notice.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 8; 1983, ch. 115, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.

4-31-206. False statements — Felony.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make, utter or publish a false statement of substance or aid or abet another person in making, uttering or publishing a false statement of substance for the purpose of influencing the authority to make a loan or deposit to finance an agricultural enterprise or to purchase a loan that finances an agricultural enterprise.

A violation of this section is a Class E felony.

Acts 1981, ch. 394, § 9; 1983, ch. 115, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 17.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agriculture, § 3.